Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4714
Transitional provision.

Except as provided in section 30-4713, the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act applies to a judicial proceeding with respect to property to which the act applies commenced on or after July 19, 2024, regardless of the date of death of the decedent.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 14.